Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-463
Uniformity of application and construction.

The Uniform Partnership Act of 1998 shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of the act among states enacting it.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 63.